Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1334DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1334DP (2) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 11.5A, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
11.5A Audit or examination —— costs.
When requested by the auditor of state, the department
of management shall transfer from any unappropriated funds
in the state treasury an amount not exceeding the expenses
and prorated salary costs already paid to perform audits or
examinations of state departments and agencies, the offices
of the judicial branch, and federal financial assistance as
defined in the federal Single Audit Act, 31 U.S.C. §7501, et
seq., received by all other departments, as listed in section
11.5B, for which payments by agencies have not been made. Upon
payment by the departments, the auditor of state shall credit
the payments to the state treasury.
Sec. 2. Section 11.5B, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
11.5B Repayment of audit expenses by state departments and
agencies.
The auditor of state shall be reimbursed by a state
department or agency for performing all audits or examinations
of the following state departments or agencies department or
agency, or funds received by a the department or agency:.
1. Department of insurance and financial services.
2. Department of health and human services.
3. State department of transportation.
4. State board of regents.
5. Department of agriculture and land stewardship.
6. Department of veterans affairs.
7. Department of education.
8. Department of workforce development.
9. Department of natural resources.
10. Offices of the clerks of the district court of the
judicial branch.
11. The Iowa public employees’ retirement system.
12. Federal financial assistance, as defined in the federal
LSB 1334DP (2) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/2

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Single Audit Act, 31 U.S.C. §7501, et seq., received by all
other departments.
13. Department of administrative services.
Sec. 3. Section 11.5C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. If the state department that is the subject of the review
is listed in section 11.5B, the The state department shall
reimburse the auditor of state for the cost of the review and
any subsequent assistance provided by the auditor of state.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 11.5D Billing rates.
The auditor of state shall annually adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 17A to establish the hourly billing rate at which
audit services are performed by state auditors as described in
section 11.31.